Maryland, session 2026, HB0541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–449.
(a) In this section, “menstrual hygiene products” means size–appropriate
tampons or sanitary napkins for use in connection with the menstrual cycle.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, each county board shall ensure that
each public school [provide]:
(1) PROVIDE, at no charge to students, menstrual hygiene products via
dispensers in the women’s restrooms at the school; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0541*

HOUSE BILL 541
(2) REGULARLY RESTOCK THE DISPENSERS WITH MENSTRUAL
HYGIENE PRODUCTS TO ENSURE AVAILABILITY.
(c) (1) [A] EACH public middle or high school shall install menstrual hygiene
product dispensers in:
(i) At least two women’s restrooms on or before October 1, 2022; and
(ii) On or before August 1, 2025, all women’s restrooms.
(2) [A] EACH public elementary school shall install menstrual hygiene
product dispensers in at least one restroom on or before October 1, 2022.
(d) (1) The State shall reimburse a county board for the costs of purchasing
and installing menstrual hygiene product dispensers to comply with the requirements of
subsection (c) of this section.
(2) Each county board shall submit to the Department a request for
reimbursement for the costs of purchasing and installing menstrual hygiene product
dispensers to comply with the requirements of:
(i) Subsection (c)(1)(i) and (2) of this section, on or before November
1, 2022; and
(ii) Subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section, on or before September 1,
2025.
(3) For fiscal year 2023, the Governor shall include in the annual budget
bill an appropriation of $500,000 to be used to reimburse each county board for the costs
reported to the Department under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.